Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4686.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [181.9931] DEFINITIONS. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of sections 181.9931 to 181.9938, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Artificial intelligence" means an engineered or machine-based system that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical or virtual environments. new text end new text begin (c) "Authorized representative" means any person or organization appointed by the worker to serve as an agent of the worker. Authorized representative does not include a worker's employer. new text end new text begin (d) "Automated decision system" means any computational process derived from machine learning, statistical modeling, data analytics, or artificial intelligence that issues simplified output, including a score, classification, or recommendation, that is used to partially or fully replace human discretionary decision-making and materially impacts natural persons. An automated decision system does not include a spam email filter, a firewall, antivirus software, identity and access management tools, a calculator, a database, a dataset, or another compilation of data. new text end new text begin (e) "Automated decision system output" means any information, data, assumptions, predictions, scoring, recommendations, decisions, or conclusions generated by an automated decision system. new text end new text begin (f) "Electronic monitoring tool" means any system, application, or instrument that facilitates the collection of data concerning worker activities, communications, actions, biometrics, or behaviors by means other than direct observation by a person, including but not limited to video or audio surveillance, continuous incremental time-tracking tools, geolocation, electromagnetic tracking, or photoelectronic tracking, or that utilizes a photo-optical system or similar means. new text end new text begin (g) "Employer" means any person who directly or indirectly, or through an agent, vendor, or any other person, employs or exercises control over the wages, benefits, other compensation, hours, working conditions, access to work or job opportunities, or other terms or conditions of employment, of any worker. Employer includes all units of state and local government but does not include the federal government. Employer includes a labor contractor or vendor of a person defined as an employer under this paragraph. new text end new text begin (h) "Employment-related decision" means any decision by an employer that impacts wages, wage setting, benefits, compensation, work hours, work schedule, performance evaluation, hiring, recruitment, discipline, promotion, termination, job tasks, skill requirements, work responsibilities, assignment of work, access to work and training opportunities, productivity requirements, workplace health and safety, and any other terms or conditions of employment. For persons classified as independent contractors or for candidates for employment, an employment-related decision means the equivalent of these decisions based on the person's contract with or relationship to the employer. new text end new text begin (i) "Essential job functions" means the fundamental duties of a position, as revealed by objective evidence such as the amount of time workers spend performing each function, the consequences of not requiring individuals to perform the function, the terms of any applicable collective bargaining agreement, workers' past and present work experiences and performance in the position, and the employer's reasonable, nondiscriminatory judgment of which functions are essential. Past and current written job descriptions and the employer's reasonable, nondiscriminatory judgment of which functions are essential is evidence of which functions are essential for achieving the purpose of the job, but must not be the sole basis for this determination absent the objective evidence described in this paragraph. new text end new text begin (j) "Vendor" means a third party, subcontractor, or entity engaged by an employer or an employer's labor contractors to provide software, technology, or a related service that is used to collect, store, analyze, or interpret worker data or worker information. new text end new text begin (k) "Worker" means any natural person who is a job applicant to, an employee of, or an independent contractor providing service to or through an employer. new text end new text begin (l) "Worker data" means any information that identifies, relates to, describes, or is reasonably capable of being associated or directly or indirectly linked with a worker, regardless of how the information is collected, inferred, or obtained. Worker data includes but is not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) personal identity information, including the worker's name, contact information, government-issued identification numbers, financial information, criminal record, or employment history; new text end new text begin (2) biometric information, including data generated by automatic measurements of a worker's biological characteristics, such as a fingerprint, a faceprint, a voiceprint, eye retinas or irises, gait, or other unique biological patterns or characteristics that can be used, individually or in combination with other data, to identify or collect information about a worker; new text end new text begin (3) health, medical, lifestyle, and wellness information, including the worker's medical history, physical or mental condition, diet or physical activity patterns, heart rate, medical treatment or diagnosis by a health care professional, health insurance policy number, subscriber identification number, or other unique identifier used to identify the worker; and new text end new text begin (4) any data related to workplace activities, including the following: new text end new text begin (i) human resources information, including the contents of a worker's personnel file or performance evaluations; new text end new text begin (ii) work process information, such as data relating to an individual worker's performance or productivity, including but not limited to the quality and quantities of tasks performed, quality and quantities of items or materials handled or produced, rates or speeds of tasks performed, measurements or metrics of worker performance in relation to a quota, and time categorized as performing tasks or not performing tasks; new text end new text begin (iii) data that captures workplace communications and interactions, including emails, texts, internal message boards, screenshots, and customer interaction and ratings; new text end new text begin (iv) device usage and data, including but not limited to keystroke recording; website, software, and application utilization; calls placed; or geolocation information; new text end new text begin (v) audio, photo, or video data or other information collected from sensors, including movement tracking; thermal sensors; voiceprints; or facial recognition, emotion, and gait recognition; new text end new text begin (vi) inputs to or outputs generated by an automated decision system that are linked to the worker; new text end new text begin (vii) data collected through electronic monitoring or continuous incremental time-tracking tools; and new text end new text begin (viii) data collected or generated on workers to mitigate the spread of infectious diseases, including COVID-19, or to comply with public health measures. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [181.9932] PRE-USE NOTICE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Pre-use notice; provision. new text end new text begin (a) An employer must provide a written notice that an electronic monitoring tool is in use at the workplace to a worker who will be directly or indirectly affected by the electronic monitoring tool, or the worker's authorized representative, and to any union representing workers who could be directly or indirectly affected by the electronic monitoring tool. new text end new text begin (b) The notice in paragraph (a) must be provided: new text end new text begin (1) if the electronic monitoring tool is introduced after the effective date of this section, at least 30 days before the introduction of the electronic monitoring tool; new text end new text begin (2) if the employer is using an existing electronic monitoring tool as of the effective date of this section, no later than September 1, 2026; new text end new text begin (3) prominently to a job applicant or new worker, before the employer collects the applicant's or worker's personal information that the employer plans to process using the electronic monitoring tool; new text end new text begin (4) at least 30 days before implementing any significant change to the electronic monitoring tool or how the employer is using the electronic monitoring tool; and new text end new text begin (5) to a union representing workers who will be subject to the electronic monitoring tool, on a timeline that provides a meaningful opportunity to bargain over the use, scope, and impact of the electronic monitoring tool prior to deployment or modification of the tool. new text end new text begin (c) Every time an employer provides a notice under paragraph (a), a copy of that notice must be submitted to the commissioner of labor and industry within ten days of the date the notice was provided to the worker. Copies of notices under paragraph (a) must also be made available to authorized representatives upon request. new text end new text begin (d) Notices under paragraph (a) must be: new text end new text begin (1) written in plain language as a separate and standalone communication; new text end new text begin (2) in the language in which routine communications and other information are provided to workers; and new text end new text begin (3) provided by a simple and easy-to-use method, including an email, hyperlink, or other written format. new text end new text begin (e) A job applicant or worker must receive the notice required under this section and respond with affirmative written consent before the worker is subject to an electronic monitoring tool. new text end new text begin (f) If reasonable alternatives to the use of the electronic monitoring tool exist, the worker must be allowed to opt out of being subject to the electronic monitoring tool. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Pre-use notice; contents. new text end new text begin The notice required under subdivision 1, paragraph (a), must contain the following information: new text end new text begin (1) a detailed description of the worker data to be collected by the electronic monitoring tool; new text end new text begin (2) the specific purpose of the electronic monitoring tool, how this form of monitoring is necessary to meet that purpose, and an explanation of why this form is the least invasive means of accomplishing this purpose; new text end new text begin (3) a description of the specific activities, locations, communications, and job titles that will be electronically monitored and the technologies that will be used; new text end new text begin (4) the frequency of electronic monitoring and worker data collection; new text end new text begin (5) a description of where, how, and for how long worker data will be stored; new text end new text begin (6) the names of any vendors conducting electronic monitoring on the employer's behalf; new text end new text begin (7) who is authorized to access the worker data gathered and under what condition access is authorized, including the names of vendors and labor contractors; new text end new text begin (8) whether and how any worker data collected by the electronic monitoring tool will be used as an input into an automated decision system; new text end new text begin (9) whether and how any worker data collected by electronic monitoring will, either alone or in conjunction with an automated decision system, be used to make an employment-related decision by the employer and, if so, the nature of that decision; new text end new text begin (10) whether and how any worker data collected by the electronic monitoring tool will be used to assess workers' productivity performance or to set productivity standards; new text end new text begin (11) an up-to-date list of all electronic monitoring tools the employer is currently using; and new text end new text begin (12) a description of the worker's rights under sections 181.9932 to 181.9938. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [181.9933] RECORDS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Data records. new text end new text begin (a) Employers must maintain records of data collected through an electronic monitoring tool for 36 months after the data's collection to ensure compliance with requests for data from workers or the commissioner of labor and industry. new text end new text begin (b) Employers must destroy any worker data collected via an electronic monitoring tool no later than 37 months after collection unless the worker has provided written and informed consent to the retention of the worker's data by the employer. new text end new text begin (c) Employers must protect the confidentiality, integrity, and accessibility of worker data using data security practices consistent with data and cyber privacy laws and appropriate to the volume and nature of the worker data collected. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Record requests. new text end new text begin (a) A worker has the right to request a copy of any of the worker's data collected through an electronic monitoring tool and any corroborating evidence used by a human reviewer. new text end new text begin (b) An employer must provide copies of the data requested within seven days of receiving a worker's request. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Record corrections. new text end new text begin (a) A worker has the right to request corrections to worker data collected through an electronic monitoring tool and any corroborating evidence used by a human reviewer. new text end new text begin (b) An employer that receives a request to correct any of the information in paragraph (a) must investigate and determine whether the disputed data is inaccurate. new text end new text begin (c) If an employer determines that the disputed data is inaccurate, the employer must: new text end new text begin (1) promptly correct the disputed data and inform the worker of the employer's decision and action; new text end new text begin (2) review and adjust any employment-related decisions that were partially or solely based on the inaccurate data, and inform the worker of the adjustment; and new text end new text begin (3) inform any third parties with which the employer shared the inaccurate data, or from which the employer received the inaccurate data, of the error and direct the third parties to correct the error. new text end new text begin (d) If an employer, upon investigation, determines that the disputed data is accurate, the employer must inform the worker of: new text end new text begin (1) the decision not to amend the disputed data; new text end new text begin (2) the steps taken to verify the accuracy of the data; and new text end new text begin (3) the evidence supporting the decision not to amend the disputed data. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [181.9934] EMPLOYER REQUIREMENTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Use of electronic monitoring tools. new text end new text begin (a) An employer may only use an electronic monitoring tool to collect worker data to: new text end new text begin (1) ensure the quality of goods and services; new text end new text begin (2) ensure or facilitate compliance with laws and regulations; and new text end new text begin (3) protect the health, safety, or security of workers or the security of the employer's facilities or computer networks. new text end new text begin (b) If the electronic monitoring tool is being used for an allowed purpose: new text end new text begin (1) the employer must specify the intended purpose of the electronic monitoring tool; new text end new text begin (2) the employer must only use the electronic monitoring tool for the purpose specified; new text end new text begin (3) the type and activated capabilities of the electronic monitoring tool must be narrowly tailored to accomplish that purpose; and new text end new text begin (4) the electronic monitoring tool must operate in a manner that is limited to the smallest number of workers possible, collects the least amount of data as is feasible, and collects data no more frequently than necessary for achieving that purpose. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibitions. new text end new text begin (a) An employer is prohibited from using an electronic monitoring tool to: new text end new text begin (1) prevent compliance with or cause a violation of any federal, state, or local law or regulation; new text end new text begin (2) obtain or infer a worker's immigration status; veteran status; ancestral history; religious or political beliefs; health or reproductive status, history, or plan; emotional or psychological state; neural data; sexual or gender orientation; disability; criminal record; or credit history; new text end new text begin (3) make predictions or inferences about a worker's behavior, beliefs, intentions, personality, emotional state, health, or other characteristics or behavior that are unrelated to the worker's essential job functions; new text end new text begin (4) identify, predict, or take adverse action against a worker for exercising the worker's legal rights; new text end new text begin (5) draw on facial, gait, or emotion recognition technologies; new text end new text begin (6) monitor workers outside of regularly-scheduled work hours and not performing work-related tasks; new text end new text begin (7) conduct audio or visual monitoring, including data collection on the frequency of use, of bathrooms or other similarly private areas, including locker rooms, changing areas, break rooms, smoking areas, worker cafeterias, lounges, areas designated for expressing breast milk, or areas designated for prayer or other religious activity; new text end new text begin (8) monitor a worker's residence, a worker's personal vehicle, or property owned or leased by a worker; new text end new text begin (9) threaten the health, welfare, safety, or legal rights of workers or the general public; or new text end new text begin (10) collect data for a purpose that was not disclosed in the notice required by section 181.9932. new text end new text begin (b) An employer must not require workers to: new text end new text begin (1) physically implant devices that collect or transmit worker data, including devices that are installed subcutaneously or incorporated into items of personal clothing or personal accessories; new text end new text begin (2) install applications that collect or transmit worker data on a worker's personal device; or new text end new text begin (3) carry or use any device with location tracking applications or services enabled unless the location tracking is: new text end new text begin (i) conducted during work hours only; new text end new text begin (ii) strictly necessary to accomplish essential job functions; and new text end new text begin (iii) narrowly limited to only the activities and times necessary to accomplish essential job functions. new text end new text begin (c) An employer must not take any adverse action against a worker based on data from a continuous time-tracking tool, except in cases of egregious misconduct. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Employment-related decisions. new text end new text begin (a) An employer must not rely solely on an electronic monitoring tool when making an employment-related decision. new text end new text begin (b) When an employer relies in part on an electronic monitoring tool in making an employment-related decision, the employer must: (1) ensure the accuracy of the worker data; and (2) use a designated internal reviewer to conduct an investigation and compile corroborating information for the decision. This information may include but is not limited to supervisory or managerial evaluations, personnel files, employee work products, or peer reviews. The designated internal reviewer must: new text end new text begin (i) be granted sufficient authority, discretion, resources, and time to corroborate the worker data collected by the electronic monitoring tool; new text end new text begin (ii) have sufficient expertise in the operation of similar systems, and a sufficient understanding of the electronic monitoring tool in question to interpret the tool's outputs as well as results of relevant impact assessments; new text end new text begin (iii) have the education, training, or experience sufficient to allow the reviewer to make a well-informed decision, including education about the limitations and biases of electronic monitoring tools and training on workers' rights under sections 181.9932 to 181.9938; and new text end new text begin (iv) be protected from retaliation for exercising the reviewer's responsibilities. new text end new text begin (c) When an employer cannot corroborate the worker data collected by the electronic monitoring tool, or the human reviewer has concluded that the worker data collected by the electronic monitoring tool is inaccurate, incomplete, or misleading, the employer must not rely on the worker data to make the employment-related decision. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [181.9935] POST-USE NOTICE AND RIGHT TO ACCESS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Notice. new text end new text begin (a) An employer that has used worker data collected by an electronic monitoring tool to make an employment-related decision must provide the affected worker with a written notice: new text end new text begin (1) at the time the employer informs the worker of the decision or no later than 15 business days from the date of the decision, whichever is earlier; or new text end new text begin (2) if the decision will result in the discipline or termination of the worker, at least 30 days before the discipline or termination will take effect. new text end new text begin (b) The notice in paragraph (a) must be: new text end new text begin (1) written in plain language as a separate and standalone communication; new text end new text begin (2) in the language in which routine communications and other information are provided to workers; and new text end new text begin (3) provided by a simple and easy-to-use method, including an email, hyperlink, or other written format. new text end new text begin (c) A notice under paragraph (a) must contain the following information: new text end new text begin (1) an acknowledgment that the employer used worker data collected by an electronic monitoring tool to make one or more employment-related decisions with respect to the worker; new text end new text begin (2) a description of the worker's rights under sections 181.9932 to 181.9938; new text end new text begin (3) a form or a link to an electronic form for the worker to file an appeal or request detailed information about the worker data and the electronic monitoring tool used in the decision; and new text end new text begin (4) that the employer is prohibited from retaliating against the worker for exercising the worker's rights under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Right to access. new text end new text begin (a) When responding to a worker's access request, an employer must provide the following information to the worker: new text end new text begin (1) a plain-language explanation of the specific decision for which the employer used the worker data collected by an electronic monitoring tool; new text end new text begin (2) the specific electronic monitoring tool used to collect the worker data, how the tool gathers and analyzes the data, and the locations where and increments of time when the data is gathered; new text end new text begin (3) a machine-readable copy of the worker data gathered through the electronic monitoring tool; new text end new text begin (4) any additional information used in the decision-making process gathered through sources other than electronic monitoring, including any performance standards used, inferences about the worker made by automated decision systems, and aggregate benchmark data from other workers; and new text end new text begin (5) the names of any vendors conducting electronic monitoring on the employer's behalf. new text end new text begin (b) An employer must respond to an access request no later than 14 calendar days from the date the employer received the request. new text end new text begin (c) A service provider, contractor, or vendor must provide full assistance to the employer in responding to a worker request for access, including any of that worker's data in the service provider's, contractor's, or vendor's possession, and any relevant information about the electronic monitoring tool. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [181.9936] RIGHT TO APPEAL. new text end new text begin (a) An employer that uses worker data collected through an electronic monitoring tool to make an employment-related decision must provide the affected worker with a form, or a link to an electronic form, to appeal the decision. new text end new text begin (b) The appeal form provided to an affected worker must include: new text end new text begin (1) the option to request access to the worker data used to make the decision; new text end new text begin (2) the option to request access to any corroborating or supporting evidence provided by a human reviewer to verify the worker data collected through an electronic monitoring tool; new text end new text begin (3) space for the worker's reason for an appeal and any evidence the worker has to support the appeal; and new text end new text begin (4) information on how the worker can designate an authorized representative who can also access the data. new text end new text begin (c) A worker must appeal the employment-related decision within 30 days of the date the worker was notified under section 181.9935 of the use of the automated decision system. new text end new text begin (d) An employer must respond to a worker submitting an appeal form within five business days of receiving the form. To respond to an appeal, the employer must designate a human reviewer who: new text end new text begin (1) will objectively evaluate all evidence; new text end new text begin (2) has sufficient authority, discretion, and resources to evaluate the decision, including education about the limitations and biases of electronic monitoring tools and training on workers' rights under sections 181.9932 to 181.9938; new text end new text begin (3) has the authority to overturn the employer's decision; and new text end new text begin (4) was not involved in making the decision that the worker is appealing. new text end new text begin (e) After reviewing the evidence, the human reviewer must produce a clearly written document describing the result of the appeal and the reasons for that result. This document must be provided to both the employer and the worker. new text end new text begin (f) If the human reviewer determines that the employment-related decision should be overturned, the employer must rectify the decision within five business days of receiving the decision. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin [181.9937] DATA SALE AND SECURITY. new text end new text begin (a) An employer must not transfer, sell, or license worker data, including deidentified or aggregated data, to a vendor, subcontractor, or other third party, including another employer, unless: new text end new text begin (1) the vendor is under contract to analyze or interpret the worker data and the contract prohibits the sale or licensing of the worker data; new text end new text begin (2) the vendor implements reasonable security procedures to protect the worker data from unauthorized or illegal access, destruction, use, modification, or disclosure; and new text end new text begin (3) the vendor agrees to be jointly and severally liable for worker data breaches. new text end new text begin (b) An employer must not share worker data with the federal, state, or a local government unless required to do so by law. new text end new text begin (c) An employer or vendor must keep worker data secure by preventing unauthorized access and implementing a security system with up-to-date safeguards in place. new text end new text begin (d) Worker data collected by an employer or a vendor must be accessible only to authorized personnel. new text end new text begin (e) If a data breach occurs, the employer must give notice to workers of the specific categories of data that were impacted as soon as possible. new text end new text begin (f) A vendor must return to the worker and employer all worker data collected through electronic monitoring tools in a user-friendly format and delete any remaining copies of the worker data at the end of the vendor's contract with the employer. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin [181.9938] ENFORCEMENT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Retaliation. new text end new text begin An employer must not discharge, threaten to discharge, demote, suspend, or in any manner discriminate or retaliate against any worker for using or attempting to use the worker's rights under this section and sections 181.9932 to 181.9937, including but not limited to filing a complaint with the commissioner of labor and industry, alleging a violation, cooperating in an investigation or prosecution of an alleged violation, taking any action to invoke or assist in enforcing these rights, or exercising or attempting to exercise any of these rights. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Enforcement. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of labor and industry must enforce this section and sections 181.9932 to 181.9937, including investigating alleged violations, ordering appropriate temporary relief to mitigate a violation or maintain the status quo pending the completion of a full investigation or hearing, issuing citations against employers, and filing civil actions. new text end new text begin (b) An employer who violates this section or sections 181.9932 to 181.9937 may be liable to the plaintiff in a civil action for any and all damages recoverable at law, including punitive damages, and injunctive and other equitable relief as determined by the court, together with costs and disbursements, including reasonable attorney fees. new text end new text begin (c) A civil action under this section may be brought in a district court of competent jurisdiction by: new text end new text begin (1) the commissioner of labor and industry; new text end new text begin (2) the attorney general under section 8.31; or new text end new text begin (3) a worker aggrieved by the violation, or the worker's exclusive representative. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Civil penalties. new text end new text begin (a) An employer who violates section 181.9932 or section 181.9935 is subject to a civil penalty of up to $1,000 per violation to be deposited in the workforce development fund. Each day a worker is affected constitutes a separate violation. new text end new text begin (b) An employer who violates section 181.9933, 181.9934, 181.9936, or 181.9937 is subject to a civil penalty of up to $2,500 per violation to be deposited in the workforce development fund. Each day a worker is affected constitutes a separate violation. Under section 181.9934, each use of an electronic monitoring tool constitutes a separate violation. new text end new text begin (c) In determining the penalty amount for a violation listed under this subdivision, the commissioner must consider the size of the employer and the severity of the violation. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Joint and several liability. new text end new text begin Each employer and labor contractor or vendor engaged by an employer to provide services is jointly and severally liable for any violation of this section or sections 181.9932 to 181.9937. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Preemption. new text end new text begin This section does not preempt any city, county, or city and county ordinance that provides equal or greater protection to workers who are covered by this section and sections 181.9932 to 181.9937. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Model notice. new text end new text begin The commissioner of labor and industry must create and publish on the department's website model language that employers may use for the notices and appeal form required under sections 181.9932 and 181.9935. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin Sections 1 to 8 are effective January 1, 2027. new text end